Utah statutes.
26-6-13.   Rabies or other animal disease -- Authority of peace officer to kill or capture animals.

During the period any quarantine order is in force all peace officers may kill or capture and hold for further action by the department all animals in a quarantined area not held in restraint on private premises.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

